en: Toys & Games > Toys > Beach & Sand Toys: Beach Balls; Beach Buckets; Inflatable Rafts & Floats; Sand & Water Mills; Sand Castle Molds; Sand Cups; Sand Rakes; Sand Shovels & Spades; Sand Sifting Sieves; Sand Toy Sets; Water Guns
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Speelgoed > Speelgoed voor op het strand en in de zandbak: Ballen voor op het strand; Emmers voor op het strand; Opblaasbare vlotten en drijvers; Molens voor in de zandbak en in het water; Kasteelvormen voor in de zandbak; Bekers voor in de zandbak; Harken voor in de zandbak; Schoffels en spaden voor in de zandbak; Zeven voor in de zandbak; Speelgoedsets voor in de zandbak; Waterpistolen
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Oyuncaklar > Plaj ve Kum Oyuncakları: Deniz Topları; Plaj Kovaları; Şişirilebilir Sallar ve Şamandıralar; Kum ve Su Değirmenleri; Kumdan Kale Kalıpları; Kum Bardakları; Kum Tırmıkları; Kum Kürekleri; Kum Eleme Elekleri; Kum Oyuncak Setleri; Su Tabancaları
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Igrače > Igrače za plažo in mivko: Žoge za plažo; Vedra za plažo; Napihljivi čolni in splavi; Mlini za pesek in vodo; Kalupi za gradnjo peščenih gradov; Modelčki za pesek; Grablje za pesek; Lopate in motike za pesek; Sita za pesek; Kompleti igrač za pesek; Vodne pištole
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Plážové hračky do piesku: Plážové lopty; Plážové vedierka; Nafukovacie rafty a plaváky; Pieskové a vodné mlyny; Formičky do piesku; Poháre do piesku; Hrable do piesku; Lopatky a rýle do piesku; Sitká na preosievanie piesku; Súpravy hračiek do piesku; Vodné pištole
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki > Zabawki na plażę i do piasku: Piłki plażowe; Wiaderka plażowe; Nadmuchiwane tratwy i pływaki; Młyny na piasek i wodę; Foremki do zamków z piasku; Foremki na piasek; Grabki do piasku; Łopaty i łopatki do piasku; Sitka do przesiewania piasku; Zestawy zabawek do piasku; Pistolety na wodę
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > おもちゃ > 砂あそび用おもちゃ: ビーチボール; ビーチバケツ; インフレータブル ラフト・フロート; サンドウォーターミル; 砂の城の型; サンドカップ; サンドレーキ; シャベル・スペード; 砂ふるい; おもちゃセット; 水鉄砲
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeuge > Strand- & Sandspielzeug: Strandbälle; Strandeimer; Aufblasbare Floße & Floats; Sand- & Wassermühlen; Sandburgformen; Sandbecher; Sandrechen; Sandschaufeln & Spaten; Sandsiebe; Sandspielzeug-Sets; Wasserpistolen
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos para praia e areia: Bolas de praia; Baldes de praia; Jangadas e flutuadores infláveis; Moinhos para areia e água; Moldes de castelo de areia; Copos para areia; Ancinhos para areia; Pás para areia; Peneiras para areia; Conjuntos de brinquedos para areia; Pistolas d´água
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos de praia: Bolas de praia; Baldes de praia; Jangadas e boias insufláveis; Moinhos de areia e água; Moldes de castelo de areia; Copos de areia; Ancinhos de areia; Pás curvas e planas para areia; Peneiras para peneirar areia; Conjuntos de brinquedos para areia; Pistolas de água
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Igračke > Igračke za plažu i pijesak: Lopte za plažu; Kantice za plažu; Splavi i plovci na napuhavanje; Mlinovi za pijesak i vodu; Kalupi za dvorce od pijeska; Šalice za pijesak; Grablje za pijesak; Lopatice za pijesak; Sita za prosijavanje pijeska; Setovi igračaka za pijesak; Pištolji za vodu
nb: Leker og spill > Leker > Strand- og sandleker: Strandballer; Strandbøtter; Oppblåsbare flåter; Sand- og vannmøller; Sandslottformer; Sandkopper; Sandriver; Sandskuffer og -spader; Sandsiler; Sandlekesett; Vannpistoler
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Játékok > Strand- és homokjátékok: Strandlabdák; Strandvödrök; Felfújható raftok és úszók; Homok- és vízmalmok; Homokvár-formák; Homokcsészék; Homokgereblyék; Homoklapátok és -ásók; Homokszűrő sziták; Homok-játék-készletek; Vízi fegyverek
sv: Leksaker och spel > Leksaker > Strand- och sandleksaker: Strandbollar; Strandhinkar; Uppblåsbara flottar och flottörer; Sand- och vattenkvarnar; Sandslottsformar; Sandkoppar; Sandkrattor; Sandskyfflar och -spadar; Sandsilar; Sandleksaksset; Vattenpistoler
ru: Игрушки и игры > Игрушки > Игрушки для пляжа и песочницы: Пляжные мячи; Пляжные ведерки; Надувные матрасы и круги; Песчаные и водяные мельницы; Формочки для замков из песка; Стаканчики для песка; Грабли для песка; Лопаты и совки для песка; Сита для песка; Наборы для игры с песком; Водяные пистолеты
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Đồ chơi > Đồ chơi bãi biển & Xúc cát: Bóng chơi bãi biển; Xô bãi biển; Bè & phao bơm hơi; Máy xay cát & nước; Khuôn lâu đài cát; Cốc đựng cát; Cào cát; Xẻng và mai xúc cát; Sàng lọc cát; Bộ đồ chơi với cát; Súng nước
cs: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Hračky na pískoviště a na pláž: Plážové míče; Kyblíky na pláž; Nafukovací rafty a doplňky do vody; Mlýnky na písek a vodu; Formičky na hrady z písku; Kelímky na písek; Hrabičky na písek; Lopatky a rýče na písek; Sítka na prosévání písku; Sady hraček na písek; Vodní pistole
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Giocattoli > Giocattoli spiaggia e sabbia: Palloni da spiaggia; Secchielli da spiaggia; Zattere e galleggianti gonfiabili; Mulini a sabbia e ad acqua; Stampi per castelli di sabbia; Contenitori per sabbia; Rastrelli per sabbia; Pale e vanghe per sabbia; Setacci per sabbia; Set di giocattoli per sabbia; Pistole ad acqua
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jouets > Jouets de sable et de plage: Ballons de plage; Seaux de plage; Radeaux et flotteurs gonflables; Moulins à sable et à eau; Moules pour châteaux de sable; Coupes de sable; Râteaux à sable; Pelles et bêches à sable; Tamis de sable; Ensembles de jouets de plage; Pistolets à eau
ko: 장난감/게임 > 장난감 > 해변/모래놀이 장난감: 물놀이 공; 모래놀이 양동이; 공기주입식 뗏목/대형 튜브; 모래/물 방앗간; 모래성 틀; 모래놀이 컵; 모래 갈퀴; 모래삽; 모래 거름채; 모래놀이 세트; 물총
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 玩具 > 玩沙工具組: 沙灘球; 沙灘桶; 充氣筏和漂浮玩具; 沙/水車; 沙堡模具; 沙杯; 沙耙; 沙鏟; 沙篩; 玩沙玩具組; 水槍
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Žaislai > Paplūdimio ir smėlio žaislai: Paplūdimio kamuoliai; Paplūdimio kibirėliai; Pripučiami plaustai ir plūdės; Smėlio ir vandens malūnai; Smėlio pilių formos; Smėlio puodeliai; Smėlio grėbliukai; Smėlio semtuvėliai ir kastuvai; Smėlio sijojimo sieteliai; Smėlio žaislų rinkiniai; Vandens ginklai
el: Παιχνίδια > Παιχνίδια (Toys) > Παιχνίδια παραλίας & άμμου: Μπάλες παραλίας; Κουβαδάκια παραλίας; Φουσκωτές σχεδίες & φουσκωτά; Μύλοι για άμμο & νερό; Καλούπια για κάστρα στην άμμο; Κύπελλα άμμου; Τσουγκράνες άμμου; Φτυάρια & σπάτουλες άμμου; Κόσκινα για άμμο; Σετ παιχνιδιών άμμου; Νεροπίστολα
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Играчки > Играчки за плаж и пясък: Плажни топки; Плажни кофи; Надуваеми салове и средства за плуване; Мелници за пясък и вода; Форми за пясъчни замъци; Пясъчни чаши; Гребла за пясък; Лопати за пясък; Сита за пресяване на пясък; Комплекти играчки за пясък; Водни пистолети
da: Legetøj og spil > Legetøj > Strandlegetøj: Badebolde; Strandspande; Oppustelige flåder og svømmeblærer; Sand- og vandmøller; Sandslotsforme; Sandkopper; Sandriver; Sandskovle og -spader; Sandsigte; Sandlegetøjssæt; Vandpistoler
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 玩具 > 沙滩玩具: 沙滩球; 沙滩桶; 充气筏/漂浮物; 砂磨机/水磨机; 沙堡模具; 沙杯; 沙耙; 沙铲/沙锹; 沙筛; 沙子玩具套装; 水枪
es: Juegos y juguetes > Juguetes > Juguetes para la arena: Pelotas de playa; Cubos de playa; Balsas y flotadores hinchables; Molinos de arena y agua; Moldes de castillos de arena; Tazas de arena; Rastrillos de arena; Palas y rastrillos de arena; Coladores de arena; Juegos de juguetes de arena; Pistolas de agua
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Lelut > Ranta- ja hiekkalelut: Rantapallot; Rantaämpärit; Puhallettavat patjat ja lautat; Hiekka- ja vesimyllyt; Hiekkalaatikkomuotit; Hiekkakupit; Hiekkaharavat; Hiekkalapiot ja -kuokat; Hiekkasiivilät; Hiekkalelusetit; Vesipyssyt
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Jucării > Jucării pentru plajă și nisip: Mingi de plajă; Găletușe pentru plajă; Plute și jucării plutitoare gonflabile; Mori cu nisip și apă; Forme pentru castele de nisip; Pahare pentru nisip; Greble pentru nisip; Lopeți și hârlețe pentru nisip; Site pentru cernut nisipul; Seturi de jucării pentru nisip; Pistoale cu apă
th: ของเล่นและเกม > ของเล่น > ของเล่นสำหรับชายหาดและทราย: ลูกบอลชายหาด; ถังชายหาด; แพยางและอุปกรณ์ลอยน้ำเป่าลม; กังหันทรายและน้ำ; แม่พิมพ์ปราสาททราย; ถ้วยใส่ทราย; คราดทราย; พลั่วและจอบทราย; ตะแกรงร่อนทราย; ชุดของเล่นทราย; ปืนฉีดน้ำ